California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(c) (1) Transfers of revenues from the Highway Users Tax Account to counties or cities pursuant to this section collected during the months of March, April, May, June, and July of 2008, shall be made with the transfer of August 2008 revenues in September of 2008. This suspension shall not apply to a county with a population of less than 40,000.

(2) For the purpose of meeting the cash obligations associated with ongoing budgeted costs, a city or county may make use of any cash balance in the city account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for local streets and roads or the county road fund,
 including that resulting from the receipt of funds pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code (hereafter bond act)) for local streets and roads maintenance, during the period of this suspension, without the use of this cash being reflected as an expenditure of bond act funds, provided the cash is replaced once this suspension is repaid in September of 2008. Counties and cities may accrue the revenue received in September 2008 as repayment of these suspensions for the months of April, May, and June of 2008 back to the 2007–08 fiscal year. Nothing in this paragraph shall change the fact that expenditures must be accrued and reflected from the appropriate funding sources for which the moneys were received and meet all the requirements of those funding sources.

(d) (1) The
 transfer of revenues from the Highway Users Tax Account to counties or cities pursuant to this section collected during the months of January, February, and March 2009 shall be made with the transfer of April 2009 revenues in May 2009.

(2) For the purpose of meeting the cash obligations associated with ongoing budgeted costs, a city or county may make use of any cash balance in the city account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for local streets and roads or the county road fund, including that resulting from the receipt of funds pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code (bond act)) for local streets and roads maintenance, during the period of this suspension, and the use of this cash shall not be considered as an expenditure of bond act funds, if the cash is replaced
 when the payments that are suspended pursuant to this subdivision are repaid in May 2009.

(3) This subdivision shall not affect any requirement that an expenditure is required to be accrued and reflected from the appropriate funding source for which the money was received and to meet all the requirements of its funding source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, a sum equal to the net revenue derived from 5.8 percent of the per gallon tax under the Motor Vehicle Fuel License Tax Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) shall be apportioned monthly from the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund among the counties and cities as follows:

(a) Four hundred dollars ($400) per month shall be apportioned to each city and city and county and eight hundred dollars ($800) per month shall be apportioned to each county and city and county.

(b) On the last day of each month, the sum of six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) shall be transferred to the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund for the Active Transportation Program pursuant to Chapter
 8 (commencing with Section 2380). For each month in the 2013–14 fiscal year that has passed prior to the enactment of the bill adding this sentence, six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) shall be immediately transferred from the Bicycle Transportation Account to the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund for the Active Transportation Program, less any amount already expended for that program from the Bicycle Transportation Account during the 2013–14 fiscal year.

(c) The balance shall be apportioned, as follows:

(1) A base sum shall be computed for each county by using the same proportions of fee-paid and exempt vehicles as are established for purposes of apportionment of funds under subdivision (d) of Section 2104.

(2) For each county, the percentage of the total assessed valuation of tangible
 property subject to local tax levies within the county which is represented by the assessed valuation of tangible property outside the incorporated cities of the county shall be applied to its base sum, and the resulting amount shall be apportioned to the county. The assessed valuation of taxable tangible property, for purposes of this computation, shall be that most recently used for countywide tax levies as reported to the Controller by the State Board of Equalization. If an incorporation or annexation is legally completed following the base sum computation, the new city’s assessed valuation shall be deducted from the county’s assessed valuation, the estimate of which may be provided by the State Board of Equalization.

(3) The difference between the base sum for each county and the amount apportioned to the county shall be apportioned to the cities of that county in the proportion that the population of each city bears to the total population
 of all the cities in the county. Populations used for determining apportionment of money under Section 2107 are to be used for purposes of this section.

(d) (1) Transfers of revenues from the Highway Users Tax Account to counties or cities pursuant to this section collected during the months of March, April, May, June, and July of 2008, shall be made with the transfer of August 2008 revenues in September of 2008. This suspension shall not apply to a county with a population of less than 40,000.

(2) For the purpose of meeting the cash obligations associated with ongoing budgeted costs, a city or county may make use of any cash balance in the city account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for local streets and roads or the county road fund, including that resulting from the receipt of funds pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic
 Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code (hereafter bond act)) for local streets and roads maintenance, during the period of this suspension, without the use of this cash being reflected as an expenditure of bond act funds, provided the cash is replaced once this suspension is repaid in September of 2008. Counties and cities may accrue the revenue received in September 2008 as repayment of these suspensions for the months of April, May, and June of 2008 back to the 2007–08 fiscal year. Nothing in this paragraph shall change the fact that expenditures must be accrued and reflected from the appropriate funding sources for which the moneys were received and meet all the requirements of those funding sources.

(e) (1) The transfer of revenues from the Highway Users Tax Account to counties or cities pursuant to this
 section collected during the months of January, February, and March 2009, shall be made with the transfer of April 2009 revenues in May 2009.

(2) For the purpose of meeting the cash obligations associated with ongoing budgeted costs, a city or county may make use of any cash balance in the city account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for local streets and roads or the county road fund, including that resulting from the receipt of funds pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code (bond act)) for local streets and roads maintenance, during the period of this suspension, and the use of this cash shall not be considered as an expenditure of bond act funds, if the cash is replaced when the payments that are suspended pursuant to this subdivision are repaid in May 2009.

(3) This subdivision shall not affect any requirement that an expenditure is required to be accrued and reflected from the appropriate funding source for which the money was received and to meet all the requirements of its funding source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 20, Sec. 19.   (AB 115)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.3.

If Los Angeles County elects to allocate any portion of the revenues it receives pursuant to Section 2104 or 2106 to the cities within the county under any program in which those revenues are allocated to at least 70 percent of the cities, it shall make allocations to each city within the county based on the two following equally weighted factors:

(1) The population of the city to the total population of all the cities in the county.

(2) The city street mileage to the total street mileage of all the cities in the county, as
 determined from the county master plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 575, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.4.

From funds apportioned to the County of Los Angeles pursuant to Sections 2104, 2105, and 2106, or from other transportation funds available to the county, or from any combination of those funds, as determined by the county, the county shall, beginning in the 1996–97 fiscal year, commence the annual transfer to the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority of funds in an amount calculated to amortize, in equal annual installments over a 5-year period, the amount by which fiscal realignment revenues deposited in the county general fund exceed fifty
 million dollars ($50,000,000). The highest priority for the use of the remaining funds apportioned to the county pursuant to this chapter shall be for safety and for maintenance of county facilities in urban areas with the highest backlog of maintenance and rehabilitation needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.5.

(a) Each county and any of its incorporated cities may enter into an agreement regarding the base sum established by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2106, providing for expenditure of the amounts apportioned to the county and apportioned for expenditure within the cities participating in the agreement upon road and streets within the county and the cities participating in the agreement.

(b) Any of the incorporated cities within a county may enter into an agreement among themselves regarding the amount apportioned to them pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section
 2106 for expenditure upon city streets within the cities participating in the agreement.

(c) Any such agreement shall be filed with the State Controller. After verification of the agreement by the State Controller, the State Controller shall make disposition of the apportionments to the parties participating in the agreement in accordance with terms of the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 865.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.6.

The Sacramento County Board of Supervisors may allocate up to seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) from revenues apportioned to Sacramento County pursuant to Sections 2103, 2104, 2105, and 2106, or from other transportation funds available to the county, or from any combination of those funds, for the purpose of building a soundwall in and around the Walerga Park area adjacent to State Route 80 in Sacramento County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 12, Sec. 13.   (AB 95)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, a sum equal to the net revenues derived from 7.3 percent of the per gallon tax under the Motor Vehicle Fuel License Tax Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301) of Division 2), 2.59 cents ($0.0259) under the Use Fuel Tax Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601) of Division 2), and 11.5 percent under the Diesel Fuel Tax Law (Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001) of Division 2) of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall be apportioned monthly to the cities and cities and counties of this state from the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund as provided in this section.

(b) From the sum determined pursuant to subdivision (a), the Controller shall allocate annually to each city that has filed
 a report containing the information prescribed by subdivision (c) of Section 2152, and that had expenditures in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) during the preceding fiscal year for snow removal, an amount equal to one-half of the amount of its expenditures for snow removal in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) during that fiscal year.

(c) The balance of the sum determined pursuant to subdivision (a) from the Highway Users Tax Account shall be allocated to each city, including city and county, in the proportion that the total population of the city bears to the total population of all the cities in this state.

(d) (1) For the purpose of this section, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), the population in each city is the population determined for that city in the manner specified in Section 11005.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) Commencing with the ninth fiscal year of a city described in subdivision (a) of Section 11005.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the sixth fiscal year of a city described in subdivision (b) of Section 11005.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and the 61st month of the city described in subdivision (c) of Section 11005.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the population in each city is the actual population of that city, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 11005.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(e) (1) Transfers of revenues from the Highway Users Tax Account to cities pursuant to this section collected during the months of March, April, May, June, and July of 2008, shall be made with the transfer of August 2008 revenues in September of 2008.

(2) For the purpose of meeting the cash
 obligations associated with ongoing budgeted costs, a city may make use of any cash balance in the city account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for local streets and roads, including that resulting from the receipt of funds pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code (hereafter bond act)) for local streets and roads maintenance, during the period of this suspension, without the use of this cash being reflected as an expenditure of bond act funds, provided the cash is replaced once this suspension is repaid in September of 2008. Cities may accrue the revenue received in September 2008 as repayment of these suspensions for the months of April, May, and June of 2008 back to the 2007–08 fiscal year. Nothing in this paragraph shall change the fact that expenditures must be accrued and reflected from the appropriate funding sources for
 which the moneys were received and meet all the requirements of those funding sources.

(f) (1) A transfer of revenues from the Highway Users Tax Account to cities pursuant to this section collected during the months of January, February, and March 2009, shall be made with the transfer of April 2009 revenues in May 2009.

(2) For the purpose of meeting the cash obligations associated with ongoing budgeted costs, a city may make use of any cash balance in the city account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for local streets and roads, including that resulting from the receipt of funds pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code (bond act)) for local streets and roads maintenance, during
 the period of this suspension, and the use of this cash shall not be reflected as an expenditure of bond act funds, if the cash is replaced once this suspension is repaid in May 2009.

(3) This subdivision shall not affect any requirement that an expenditure is required to be accrued and reflected from the appropriate funding sources for which the moneys were received and to meet all the requirements of those funding sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 41.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.1.

Any city or city and county may apply to the United States Bureau of Census to determine its population. Upon receipt from the bureau of its determination of population, the city or city and county may, at its option, file a certified copy of the determination with the Controller.

All apportionments made under Section 2107 and all payments under Section 11005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for any apportionment made beginning with the month following the filing of the determination shall be based upon the population so determined until such time as a subsequent determination is made by the bureau and a certified copy is filed by
 the city or city and county with the Controller or a certified copy of a subsequent estimate or census result validated by the Department of Finance is filed with the Controller as provided in Section 2107.2. For the purposes of this section, a written or telegraphic certification from the Director of the Census to the Controller of the determination of population may be accepted by the Controller in lieu of the filing by the city or city and county of the certified copy of the determination.

The cost of any determination by the United States Bureau of Census or by the Department of Finance is a proper charge against the city or city and county applying therefor and shall be paid by it to the bureau or to the department.

This section does not apply to counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.2.

Any city or city and county may apply to the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance to estimate its population or the population of any inhabited territory annexed to the city subsequent to the last federal or state census validated by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance. The department may make the estimate if in the opinion of the department there is available adequate information upon which to base the estimate. The department may develop or contract for the development of additional information if, in the opinion of the department, additional information may make an estimate feasible. Not less than 25 days nor more than 30 days after the completion of the estimate, the Department of Finance shall file a certified copy thereof with the Controller if the estimate is
 greater than the current certified population.

All apportionments under Section 2107 and all payments under Section 11005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for any apportionment made beginning with the month following the filing of the estimate shall be based upon the population so estimated until a subsequent estimate is made by the department and a certified copy is filed with the Controller or a subsequent determination is made by the United States Bureau of the Census and a certified copy is filed by the city or city and county with the Controller as provided in Section 2107.1.

The Department of Finance may assess a reasonable charge, not to exceed the actual cost thereof, for the preparation of population estimates pursuant to this section, which is a proper charge against the city or city and county applying therefor. The amount received shall be deposited in the State Treasury as a reimbursement to be credited to the
 appropriation from which the expenditure is made.

No more than one estimate of its total population shall be filed each fiscal year for each city or city and county.

As of May 1, 1988, any population estimate prepared by the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 2227 of the Revenue and Taxation Code may be used for all purposes of this section unless a written request not to certify is received by the department from the city or city and county within 25 days of completion of the estimate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 140.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.3.

The incorporation of a new city, or any annexation or exclusion of territory to or from an existing city, shall be considered for the purpose of apportionment of funds pursuant to Section 2107. The revenue shall be apportioned among the cities monthly as revenues are received in the Highway Users Tax Fund. Any newly incorporated city or any increase in population due to annexation shall be included in the monthly apportionment following such incorporation or annexation.

In the event of the disincorporation of a city, or in the event the incorporation of a city is adjudged invalid, any funds apportioned pursuant to Section 2107 to such
 city, but which are unexpended, shall revert to the Highway Users Tax Fund and shall be reapportioned to all other cities and cities and counties pursuant to Section 2107.

The Controller shall not be required to reapportion funds previously apportioned for expenditure in the different cities of the state by reason of any subsequent incorporation, invalidation of incorporation, annexation or exclusion of territory.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 205 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1621.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.4.

Not more than one-quarter of the funds allocated to a city or county from the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund for the construction of streets therein may be used to make principal and interest payments on bonds issued for such construction, if the issuance of such bonds is authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon. The term of any such bonds shall not exceed 25 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.5.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, in addition to the amounts apportioned to cities from the Highway Users Tax Fund under Sections 2106 and 2107, the following amounts shall be allocated annually during the month of July of each fiscal year for expenditure exclusively for engineering costs and administrative expenses in respect to city streets:(a) For each city with a population of over 500,000inhabitants $20,000 (b) For each city with a population of 100,000 to500,000 inhabitants 10,000(c) For each city with a population of 50,000 to 99,999inhabitants 7,500(d) For each city with a population of 25,000 to 49,999inhabitants 6,000(e) For each city with a population of 20,000 to 24,999inhabitants 5,000(f) For each city with a population of 15,000 to 19,999inhabitants 4,000(g) For each city with a population of 10,000 to 14,999inhabitants 3,000(h) For each city with a population of 5,000 to 9,999inhabitants 2,000(i) For each city with a population of less than 5,000inhabitants 1,000For the purpose of this section the population in each city shall be determined in accordance with Sections 2107, 2107.1, and 2107.2 at the time of allocation. Any city incorporated after the first day of July of any year shall receive
 the full annual allocation prescribed in this section, such allocation to be made during the month succeeding the filing or certification of the incorporation by the Secretary of State.

Any city under subdivision (h) or (i) above may expend the moneys allocated to it hereunder for acquisition of rights-of-way for and construction of its street system.

Transfers of revenues from the Highway Users Tax Account to cities pursuant to this section that are to be allocated during the month of July 2008, shall be made in September of 2008.

For the purpose of meeting the cash obligations associated with ongoing budgeted costs, a city may make use of any cash balance in the city account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for local streets and roads, including that resulting from the receipt of funds pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and
 Port Security Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code (hereafter bond act)) for local streets and roads maintenance, during the period of this suspension, without the use of this cash being reflected as an expenditure of bond act funds, provided the cash is replaced once this suspension is repaid in September of 2008. Nothing in this paragraph shall change the fact that expenditures must be accrued and reflected from the appropriate funding sources for which the moneys were received and meet all the requirements of those funding sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 1, Sec. 17.   (SB 95)   Effective February 3, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.6.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the Controller shall deduct annually, from the amount apportioned pursuant to Section 2107, the amount identified as applicable to cities in the report submitted in the preceding fiscal year pursuant to Section 191, and shall transfer the amount to the State Highway Account. The transferred amount shall be subject to appropriation pursuant to Section 183 for expenditure in
 accordance with Section 163.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 1, Sec. 18.   (SB 95)   Effective February 3, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.7.

(a) For each fiscal year, there shall be included in the annual Budget Bill submitted by the Governor an amount not to exceed twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) to be appropriated by the Legislature from the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund to the State Parks and Recreation Fund.

(b) These funds shall be appropriated to the Department of Parks and Recreation for the maintenance and repair of highways in units of the state park system.

(c) In addition, the money may be used by the Department of Parks and Recreation for construction and improvement on the highways when appropriated for such purposes by the Legislature.

(d) The highway construction and improvement shall be designed in accordance with the standards established by the Department of Parks and Recreation for state park roads, and may be carried out through service agreements with the Department of Transportation.

(e) Any increase in the amount of this appropriation shall be considered in the course of the annual budget process, which shall include review and comment by the Department of Transportation.

(f) For purposes of this section, highways in units of the state park system shall include those routes of motor vehicle travel
 generally open to public travel and service roads, parking areas, and roads within campgrounds. Nothing in this section shall constitute the highway as a state highway or add it to the state highway system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 14, Sec. 9.   (SB 124)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.9.

The Legislature finds and declares that it intends counties and cities to use the additional funds provided them by the act enacting this section during the 1980–81 Regular Session of the Legislature to supplement existing local revenues being used for transportation purposes.

Counties and cities are further encouraged to maintain their existing commitment of local funds for transportation purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 541, Sec. 22.   Effective September 17, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.10.

If the board of supervisors of a county with a population of more than 6,000,000 did not adopt and submit a resolution pursuant to Section 41 of the act enacting this section during the 1981–82 Regular Session of the Legislature, the increase in allocation for the county as a result of Section 2104, as amended and added by that act, shall instead be allocated to those cities in that county that adopted and submitted resolutions pursuant to Section 41.

The allocation shall be on the basis of the population used for purposes of Section 2107.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 541, Sec. 23.   Effective September 17, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

2108.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the balance of the money in the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, after making the apportionments or appropriations, as the case may be, pursuant to Sections 2104 to 2107.7, inclusive, shall be transferred to the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund and shall be subject to appropriation pursuant to Section 183 for expenditure in
 accordance with Section 163.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 1, Sec. 19.   (SB 95)   Effective February 3, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2108.1.

By July 1, 1990, the City, County, State Cooperation Committee in the deparment shall develop and adopt a pavement management program to be utilized on local streets or highways that receive funding under the state transportation improvement program.

The pavement management program shall be transmitted to every county and city for possible adoption or incorporation into an existing pavement management program.

The City, County, State Cooperation Committee shall solicit recommendations from transportation planning agencies and any other entity the
 committee deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 106, Sec. 20.   Effective July 10, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2109.

State highways shall be maintained, constructed, and improved out of the moneys received in the State Highway Account under Section 2108. Notwithstanding Section 81, the department is not required to maintain any route, or portion of a route, added after January 1, 1947, until it has been laid out and constructed as a state highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys payable to the counties under subdivision (b) of Section 2104 shall be apportioned monthly among the several counties as follows:

(1) A sum equal to the total of all reimbursable snow removal costs filed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2152, or seven million dollars
 ($7,000,000), whichever is less, shall be apportioned in 12 approximately equal monthly apportionments for snow removal or snow grooming, or both, on county roads as follows:

(2) If the total is less than seven million dollars ($7,000,000), the full amount of reimbursable snow removal or snow grooming, or both, costs shall be apportioned to the several counties in an amount equal to that computed pursuant to the report filed by each county pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2152.

(3) If the total is seven million dollars ($7,000,000) or more for the fiscal year, the Controller shall compute percentages for the apportionment of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) to the several counties in the state for snow removal or snow grooming, or both, on county roads, including the purchase of snow removal equipment therefor, and shall apportion the amount to the counties in the computed
 percentages. The percentage each county is to be apportioned during the fiscal year shall be derived by adding its reimbursable snow removal or snow grooming, or both, expenditures for the three preceding fiscal years as to which the Controller has received snow removal or snow grooming, or both, expenditure reports pursuant to Section 2152, and dividing the sum by the total amount of reimbursable snow removal or snow grooming, or both, expenditures by all counties in the state during those fiscal years.

(b) On or before the first day of March of each year, the Controller shall notify each county of the amount apportioned to it pursuant to this section for expenditure for snow removal or snow grooming, or both, on county roads during the following fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 1, Sec. 20.   (SB 95)   Effective February 3, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.5.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money payable to the counties under subdivision (c) of Section 2104 shall be apportioned monthly for heavy rainfall and storm damage on county roads to the following counties in the named percentages:Alameda 2.629Amador .135Butte .161Colusa .339Contra Costa 10.575Del Norte .251Fresno .639Humboldt 4.935Los Angeles 9.913Marin 3.781Mendocino 2.084Monterey 3.701Napa 1.950Nevada .718Orange .051Placer .085Plumas .897Riverside 1.185San Benito 1.070San Bernardino 2.609San Francisco 1.016San Diego 2.760San Luis Obispo 5.782Santa Barbara 7.661Santa Cruz 12.162Sierra .333Siskiyou .814Sonoma 10.238Trinity 2.137Ventura 8.543Yuba .846

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 1, Sec. 21.   (SB 95)   Effective February 3, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2111.

Apportionments from the Highway Users Tax Fund shall not be made to any incorporated city the streets of which are not public streets or which has not held an election of municipal officers within a period of 10 years preceding the date of such apportionment. Apportionments heretofore accumulated for expenditure within any such city shall be reapportioned to all other cities and cities and counties in the manner provided by Sections 2106 and 2107, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1060.)
-------------------------------------------

2112.

No money apportioned from the Highway Users Tax Fund as provided in Section 2106 or 2107 shall be used for the construction or improvement of any highway or street if the contract for such construction or improvement specifies the use of any patented or proprietary paving material, unless the contract has been awarded to the lowest responsible bidder therefor after alternate bids have been called for and opportunity afforded for bids to be submitted for nonpatented or nonproprietary paving material in competition with an equal thickness and like design of such patented or proprietary paving material. This section shall not be deemed nor construed to prohibit the use of any
 patented or proprietary paving material in the maintenance of any highway or street when such highway or street was constructed of such material and, in the opinion of the body, board or officer ordering such maintenance, it would be impractical to use a different paving material for such maintenance.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 195.5 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1621.)
-------------------------------------------

2113.

(a) An apportionment of money from the Highway Users Tax Account shall not be made to a city unless the city has set up, by ordinance, a special gas tax street fund.

(b) All amounts paid to each city out of the Highway Users Tax Account shall be deposited in its special gas tax street fund.

(c) In making any expenditure, a city shall follow the law governing it in regard to the doing of the particular type of work in cases that are not exclusively municipal affairs.

(d) A state officer or employee shall not
 be liable for anything done, or omitted to be done, by a city in the performance of any work.

(e) Interest received by a city from the investment of money in its special gas tax street fund shall be deposited in the fund and shall be used for street purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 643, Sec. 3.   (SB 358)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2113.5.

Any city may have any or all of its engineering and administrative work with respect to city streets done by contract. If authorized by their legislative bodies, two or more cities, by agreement, may jointly exercise the power granted by this section pursuant to the provisions of Sections 6500-6513, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 197.5 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1621.)
-------------------------------------------

2114.

Contracts for any construction and improvement projects on city streets for which funds apportioned from the Highway Users Tax Fund as provided in Section 2106 or 2107 may be expended during any fiscal year may be awarded on and after the first day of January preceding the beginning of the fiscal year.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 197.8 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1621.)
-------------------------------------------

2114.5.

In the event that any sums are taken or borrowed from the Highway Users Tax Fund, to augment the General Fund, or to pay any appropriations made from the General Fund, the Controller is authorized to reduce the amounts paid from such reduced fund proportionately to the reduction in such fund, such reductions to be made up when and if such reduced fund is reimbursed from the General Fund.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 198 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1621.)
-------------------------------------------

2115.

To permit the accomplishment of major cooperative street or highway projects in their entirety, the legislative body of a county or city may authorize the Controller to accumulate moneys accruing to the county or city over a period of time from the Highway Users Tax Fund pursuant to Section 2106 or 2107.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 200 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1621.)
-------------------------------------------

2116.

Any city may contract with the department for the performance by the department of any or all street work in such city and for such purpose may transfer to the department, for deposit in the State Treasury, any moneys available for expenditure by such city for street purposes.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 202 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1621.)
-------------------------------------------

2117.

(a) Whenever a school district constructs a school building for which any apportionment is made pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700) or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16000) of Part 10 of the Education Code, and the city or county in which the school building is situated requires the construction of any street or road connected with the school premises on which the school building is constructed, the State Allocation Board shall review the requirement and recommend to the governing body of the city or county a plan of
 construction adequate to meet the needs of the school district and the safety of the public. If a different plan of improvement or improvement to higher standards than that recommended by the State Allocation Board is required by the governing body of the city or county, the additional cost thereof shall be borne by the city or county in which the school building is situated. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or any other law limiting the purposes for which money apportioned to cities or counties from the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund may be expended, any of the moneys so apportioned may be expended for the construction of the streets or roads referred to in this section.

(b) Nothing in this section requires each cost item included in any charge made pursuant to this section to be separately stated.
